Missouri, session 2026, HB2254.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 547.370, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 547.370, to read as follows:
547.370. 1. [When a motion is filed as provided in section 547.360 to set aside a
sentence of death, the court shall] Whenever the death penalty is imposed in any case, the
circuit court shall, at the time it imposes sentence and judgment, find on the record
whether the [movant] defendant is indigent. If the [movant] defendant is indigent, the court
shall, without delay, cause to be appointed two counsel to represent the [movant] defendant
in the preparation and litigation of the defendant's motion under Missouri supreme
court rule 24.035 or 29.15. If [movant] the defendant seeks to reject the appointment of
counsel, the court shall find on the record, after a hearing, if necessary, whether the [movant]
defendant is able to competently decide whether to accept or reject the appointment and
whether the [movant] defendant rejected the offer with the understanding of its legal
consequences. Unless the [movant] defendant is so competent and understands the legal
consequences, [movant] the defendant shall not be permitted to reject the appointment of
counsel. If the defendant is not indigent, the court may enter an order denying the
appointment of counsel.
2. All counsel appointed as provided in this section shall be members of The Missouri
Bar or shall be admitted to practice in the particular case as provided in Missouri supreme
court rule 9. At least one of the counsel shall meet the following qualifications:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2254 2
(1) Have attended and successfully completed within two years immediately
preceding the appointment at least twelve hours of training or educational programs on the
postconviction phase of a criminal case and federal and state aspects of cases in which the
death penalty is sought; and
(2) Have at least three years of litigation experience in the field of criminal law and
three years of litigation experience in the field of postconviction law; and
(3) Have participated as counsel or co-counsel to final judgment in at least five
postconviction motions involving class A felonies in either state or federal trial courts; and
(4) Have participated in either state or federal court as counsel or co-counsel to final
judgment in at least:
(a) Three felony jury trials; or
(b) Five direct criminal appeals in felony cases; and
(5) Have been a member of the Missouri Bar for a period of at least five years.

Upon a showing of good cause, the circuit court may appoint other counsel whose
background, knowledge, or experience would otherwise enable such counsel to properly
represent the defendant in any motion under Missouri supreme court rule 24.035 or
29.15, with due consideration of the seriousness of the penalty and the unique and
complex nature of the litigation. Counsel shall certify to the state public defender in such
form as the defender may require that counsel meets the qualifications of this section prior to
filing counsel's entry of appearance in the case.
3. Counsel appointed to represent the [movant] defendant shall not have represented
the [movant] defendant at trial [or on] and shall not represent the defendant in the direct
appeal therefrom.
4. As to any counsel appointed as provided in this section, the state public defender
shall provide counsel with reasonable compensation and shall provide reasonable and
necessary litigation expenses.
5. This section shall apply whenever the death penalty is imposed in any case and
to any motions under Missouri supreme court rule 24.035 or 29.15 filed by a movant
challenging a sentence of death.
6. The state shall comply with any additional requirements under 28 U.S.C
Sections 2261 and 2265 and 28 CFR Section 26.22 that are not specifically contained in
this section.
✔